Hawaii statutes.
§143-11 Redemption of stray licensed dogs.
The owner of any licensed dog impounded and not claimed within twenty-four
hours as provided in section 143-10, may redeem the dog at any time before the
sale or destruction of the dog by paying to the animal control officer an
impoundment fee per day as provided in section 143-8, for the number of days
the dog was impounded. [L 1941, c 268, §10; RL 1945, §7160; RL 1955, §156-11;
HRS §143-11; am L 1983, c 227, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next